California statutes. Insurance Code
No insurer may deliver or issue for delivery a long-term care insurance policy or certificate in this state unless the insurer offers to each policyholder and certificate holder, in addition to any other inflation protection, the option to purchase a long-term care insurance policy or certificate that provides for benefit levels and benefit maximums to increase to account for reasonably anticipated increases in the costs of long-term care services covered by the policy. Insurers shall offer to each policyholder and certificate holder, at the time of purchase,
 the option to purchase a long-term care insurance policy or certificate containing an inflation protection feature which is no less favorable than one that does one or more of the following:

(a) Increases benefit levels annually in a manner so that the increases are compounded annually at a rate of not less than 5 percent.

(b) Guarantees the insured individual the right to periodically increase benefit levels without providing evidence of insurability or health status and without regard to claim status or history so long as the option for the previous period has not been declined. The amount of the additional benefit shall be no less than the difference between the existing policy benefit and that benefit compounded annually at a rate of at least 5 percent for the period beginning with the purchase of the existing benefit and extending until the year in which the offer is
 made.

(c) Covers a specified percentage of actual or reasonable charges and does not include a maximum specified indemnity amount limit.

(d) The insurer of a group long-term care insurance policy as defined in subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 10231.6, shall offer the holder of the group policy the opportunity to have the inflation protection pursuant to this section extended to existing certificate holders, but the insurer is relieved of the obligations imposed by this section if the holder of the group policy declines the insurer’s offer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 947, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10237.2.

If the policy is issued to a group, the required offering in Section 10237.1 shall be made to the group policyholder; except that if the policy is issued to a group as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 10231.6, other than to a continuing care retirement community, the offering shall be made to each proposed certificate holder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 530, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10237.3.

The offer in Section 10237.1 shall not be required of any of the following:

(a) Life insurance policies or riders containing accelerated long-term care benefits.

(b) Expense incurred long-term care insurance policies. For purposes of this subdivision, “expense incurred” does not include policies paying a certain percentage of reasonable and customary charges up to a specified, indemnity-type maximum amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 530, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10237.4.

(a) Inflation protection benefit increases under a policy that contains these benefits shall continue without regard to an insured’s age, claim status or claim history, or the length of time the person has been insured under the policy.

(b) An offer of inflation protection that provides for automatic benefit increases shall include an offer of a premium which the insurer expects to remain constant. The offer shall disclose in a conspicuous manner that the premium may change in
 the future unless the premium is guaranteed to remain constant.

(c) The inflation protection benefit increases under a policy or certificate that contains an inflation protection feature shall not be reduced due to the payment of claims.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 947, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10237.5.

(a) An inflation protection provision that increases benefit levels annually in a manner so that the increases are compounded annually at a rate not less than 5 percent shall be included in a long-term care insurance policy unless an insurer obtains a rejection of inflation protection signed by the policyholder.

(b) The rejection, to be included in the application or on a separate form, shall state: 
“I have reviewed the outline of coverage and the graphs that compare the
 benefits and premiums of this policy with and without inflation protection. Specifically, I have reviewed the plan, and I reject 5 percent annual compound inflation protection.Signature of ApplicantDate”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 947, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10237.6.

(a) An insurer shall include the following information in or with the outline of coverage:

(1) A graphic comparison of the benefit levels of a policy that increases benefits at a compounded annual rate of not less than 5 percent over the policy period with a policy that does not increase benefits. The graphic comparison shall show benefit levels over at least a 20-year period.

(2) Any expected premium increases or
 additional premiums to pay for automatic or optional benefit increases.

(b) An insurer may use a reasonable hypothetical or graphic demonstration for purposes of this disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 699, Sec. 22.   Effective October 6, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Burial Contracts [10240. - 10252.]

10240.

A “funeral insurance contract” is a life policy embodying an agreement, for a valuable consideration, to embalm or dispose of, or expressly to procure or pay or to provide funds for, in whole or in part, the embalming or disposal of the remains of any person living at the time of the issuance of such policy.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 557.)
-------------------------------------------

10242.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all funeral insurance contracts issued or delivered in this State upon the life of any person in this State and to any insurer issuing or delivering such contracts in this State upon the life of any person in this State.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 557.)
-------------------------------------------

10244.

Anything in this code or elsewhere to the contrary notwithstanding, no funeral insurance contract shall be issued or delivered in this State upon the life of any person in this State unless it contains in substance the following provisions:

(1) A provision that the insured, after three months’ premiums have been paid, is entitled to a period of grace not less than 30 days within which to make payment of any subsequent premium, subject to the option of the insurer to make an interest charge, not in excess of 6 percent per annum, for the number of days of grace elapsing before the payment of the premium; during said period of grace the policy shall continue in full force. But in case the policy becomes a claim during the said period, the amount of such unpaid premiums, with interest thereon, may be deducted from the amount payable under the policy in settlement thereof.

(2) A provision that the policy shall be incontestable after it has been in force during the lifetime of the insured for a period of two years from its date of issue or from the date of any reinstatement thereof except for suicide, nonpayment of premiums or the violation of the conditions of the policy relating to military or naval service in time of war.

(3) A provision that the policy, the application therefor and any rider attached to the policy, shall constitute the entire contract between the parties; a copy of such application shall be endorsed upon or attached to the policy when issued. An application for reinstatement, if any, shall be a part of said contract even though not attached thereto. Such policy shall not incorporate therein, by reference or otherwise, the constitution, by-laws, or rules or regulations of any organization whatsoever. No insurer or society, including any society operating under Chapter 10 of Part 2 of Division 2 of this code, operating under any law which requires such incorporation shall issue or deliver funeral insurance contracts in this State.

(4) A provision that all statements made by the insured in his application for the policy or reinstatement thereof, shall, in the absence of fraud, be deemed representations and not warranties.

(5) A provision that if the age of the insured has been misstated in the policy or application thereof, the amount payable under the policy shall be such as the premium provided for therein would have purchased at the correct age. 

(6) A provision that before the insurer may pay the proceeds of such policy or any portion thereof to any undertaker or funeral director designated in the policy for funeral services or miscellaneous expenses in connection therewith, the insurer shall require proof satisfactory to it that the services and expenses have been rendered and if proof of rendition of services and expenses is not furnished within 30 days after demand is made upon the insurer for such payment and in any event within one year from the date of the insured’s death, the insurer shall pay the proceeds of such insurance to the beneficiary designated in the policy, and if no beneficiary is so designated, to the estate of the insured or to any person, other than to such undertaker or funeral director, appearing to the insurer to be equitably entitled to all or any portion of the proceeds by reason of having incurred expense or furnished funeral services for the insured, to the extent of the expense incurred or services furnished.

(7) A provision granting the insured the right at any time during his lifetime to change the funeral director designated in the policy, if one be designated. 

(8) If an insurer issuing any such funeral insurance contract is subject to a provision in the laws under which it operates or in its constitution or charter, to the effect that any person purchasing such contract would be subject to additional assessments, premiums or calls other than the premium stated in the contract, then that fact shall be prominently displayed on the application for, and in such contract when issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 557.)
-------------------------------------------

10246.

All funeral insurance contracts shall be subject in all respects to the provisions of Sections 10150 to 10167 inclusive, and of Sections 10478 to 10489.6 inclusive of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 557.)
-------------------------------------------

10247.

Limited death benefit insurance contracts may be issued and delivered in this state upon the life of any person in this state who makes premium payments over a period of time to purchase a funeral insurance policy. Those policies shall be subject to the disclosure requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 340, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10248.

(a) Except as permitted in Section 10247, no funeral insurance contract issued or delivered in this state upon the life of any person in this state shall contain any provision scaling down or reducing the benefits payable below the face amount of the policy. The provisions of this section, however, shall not apply to a reduction of the benefit payable because of a misstatement of the age in the policy or application therefor, nor to the suicide, military or naval service or war provisions of the policy, if any, nor to contestability of the policy, nor to a policy issued on the life of a juvenile.

(b) If a limited death benefit insurance contract is issued under Section 10247, the limited death benefit period shall not exceed two years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10250.

No funeral insurance contract shall be issued or delivered in this State except by an admitted insurer issuing policies on a legal reserve basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 557.)
-------------------------------------------

10252.

No person shall sell or offer for sale any such funeral insurance contract in this state unless he or she is licensed as a life agent pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 106.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Standard Provisions in Disability Policies [10270. - 10402.1.]



  ARTICLE 1. Scope of Chapter and Definitions [10270. - 10279.]

10270.

(a) This chapter shall not apply to workers’ compensation insurance, any policy of liability insurance with or without supplementary coverage, or any policy or contract of reinsurance.

(b) This chapter shall apply to selected group disability insurance as defined in Section 10270.97, except insofar as it is exempted from Section 10401.

(c) This chapter shall apply to each of the types of insurance enumerated in this subdivision that insure more than one person, except to the extent that the type of insurance may be exempted from compliance with particular portions of this chapter by the provisions of this chapter
 relating to that type of insurance.

The types of insurance that insure more than one person and that are hereby exempted from subdivision (c) of Section 10320 (but family expense disability insurance only to the extent therein provided), and Section 10401 (but only to the extent in this chapter provided) are:

(1) Blanket insurance, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 10270.2.

(2) Tuition refund insurance, as defined in Section 10270.1.

(3) Group disability insurance, as defined in Sections 10270.5, 10270.505, and 10270.57.

(4) Family expense disability insurance, as defined in Section
 10270.7.

(5) Unemployment compensation disability insurance, as defined in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 10270.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 231, Sec. 15.   (AB 2045)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.1.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Institution” means any school, college or other institution of learning or the principal or head thereof.

“Camp” means one or more tents, vehicles, buildings or structures together with the tract of land appertaining thereto, established or maintained as living quarters for temporary occupancy by 10 or more people, and shall include the principal or head thereof.

(2) “Student” means any student or pupil or his parent, guardian or other person who pays or becomes obligated to pay the tuition or fee required for registration or attendance at the institution.

“Camper” means any person or his parent, guardian or other person who pays or becomes obligated to pay the tuition or fee required for registration or attendance at the camp.

(3) “Tuition refund insurance” means any policy which, because of a student’s or camper’s absence from, or inability to register at or attend, an institution or camp, as the case may be, provides for the indemnification of the student or camper for his loss of tuition or fee, or if he has been previously indemnified therefor by the institution or camp, for its reimbursement.

(b) Except to the extent provided herein, the other sections of this chapter shall not apply to tuition refund insurance providing coverage for ten (10) or more students or campers.

(c) No policy of tuition refund insurance shall be delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this State unless approved as to substance and form by the commissioner. The commissioner may, after notice and hearing, promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations, relating to the substance, form and issuance of such policies, as are necessary or desirable to preserve, insofar as applicable, standards as respects substance, form and issuance comparable to the standards in such respects prescribed by this chapter and applicable to disability policies, and to further the purpose or purposes for which such policies are to be issued.

(d) Tuition refund insurance may be issued only to an institution or camp which does not have a similar policy in effect, but its cost may be borne by the student or camper, as the case may be, in which event he may, upon request, obtain from the insurer a copy of the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1558.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.2.

(a) Blanket insurance is that form of insurance providing coverage for specified circumstances and insuring by description all or nearly all persons within a class of persons defined in a policy issued to a master policyholder, and not by specifically naming the persons covered, by certificate or otherwise, although a statement of the coverage provided may be given, or required by the policy to be given, to eligible persons. The permitted types of blanket insurance are those where the blanket policy is issued to any of the following:

(1) A volunteer or governmental fire department, emergency medical services company, or similar volunteer or governmental organization providing benefits to members or participants only in the event of accident incurred while
 performing actions incident to an activity or operation sponsored or supervised by the department, company, or organization.

(2) A college, school, or other institution of learning, a school district or districts or school jurisdictional unit, or to the head, principal, or governing board of an educational unit who or which shall be deemed the policyholder; providing benefits to students without necessarily any restriction as to activity, time, or place, or to teachers, employees, or volunteers, while performing actions incident to special duties, such as at camps, at summer playgrounds, or during tours or excursions; and providing benefits to students, teachers, employees, or volunteers, and spouses and dependents of students, teachers, and employees, for death or dismemberment resulting from accident, or for hospital, medical, surgical, drug, or nursing expenses resulting from accident or sickness.

(3) A sports team, camp, sponsor, or proprietor thereof, who shall be deemed the policyholder, providing benefits to sports team participants, campers, employees, officials, supervisors, volunteers, or persons responsible for their support, for death or dismemberment resulting from accident, or for hospital, medical, surgical, or nursing expenses resulting from accident, to those participants, campers, employees, officials, supervisors, volunteers, or persons responsible for their support, or arising out of sickness of those participants, campers, employees, officials, supervisors, volunteers, or persons responsible for their support, provided the accident or the first manifestation of sickness occurs while those participants, campers, employees, officials, supervisors, volunteers, or persons responsible for their support are in or on the buildings or premises of the sports team or camp, being transported between their homes and the sports team or
 camp, or while at any other place as an incident to sports team- or camp-sponsored activities or while being transported to, from, or between those places.

(4) (A) A newspaper, farm paper, magazine, or other periodical publication, which shall be deemed the policyholder, providing benefits for independent contractors, such as carriers, newsboys, dealers, distributors, wholesalers, or others engaged in the sale, distribution, collecting for, or other activities pertaining to the marketing and delivery of the publication, including attendance at a coaching school or participation as a member of a trip organized, supervised, and sponsored as a reward for meritorious service, on account of loss resulting from accident or sickness, the benefit to be payable to the independent contractors or to their parents, guardians, or other persons responsible for their support.

(B) When the premium for the insurance is paid by the person insured, the person may, upon request, obtain from the insurer in certificate form a copy of the policy.

(5) Any religious, charitable, recreational, educational, athletic, civic organization, or branch thereof, which shall be deemed the policyholder, providing benefits to any group of members, employees, or participants for death or dismemberment or for hospital, medical, surgical, or nursing expenses resulting from accident incurred incident to specific hazards pertaining to any activity or activities or operations sponsored or supervised by, or on the premises of, the policyholder.

(6) An employer, a majority of the employees in this state of an employer, or both, upon application, to pay the benefits afforded by a voluntary plan of unemployment compensation disability insurance. Notwithstanding the
 provisions of Section 10113, the policy may incorporate by reference any of the appropriate provisions of Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code and the authorized regulations of the Director of Employment Development.

(7) An employer, who shall be deemed the policyholder, providing benefits to any group of workers, dependents, or guests, limited by reference to specified hazards incident to activities or operations of the policyholder, for death or dismemberment, or for hospital, medical, surgical, or nursing expenses, resulting from accident. When the premium for the insurance is paid by the person insured, the person may, upon request, obtain from the insurer in certificate form a copy of the policy.

(8) Any common carrier or any operator, owner, or lessor of a means of transportation, who shall be deemed the policyholder,
 providing benefits to any group of persons who may become lessees or passengers, limited by reference to their travel status on that common carrier or that means of transportation, for death or dismemberment, or for hospital, medical, surgical, or nursing expenses, resulting from accident. When the premium for the insurance is paid by the person insured, the person may, upon request, obtain from the insurer in certificate form a copy of the policy.

(9) An entertainment production company, who shall be deemed the policyholder, providing benefits to any group of participants, volunteers, audience members, contestants, or workers for death or dismemberment, or for hospital, medical, surgical, or nursing expenses, resulting from accident while engaged in any activity or operation of the policyholder. When the premium for the insurance is paid by the person insured, the person may, upon request, obtain from the insurer in certificate form a copy of
 the policy.

(b) A “blanket policy” is any disability policy of the nature herein described sold to any of the entities described in paragraphs (1) to (9), inclusive, of subdivision (a) that provides coverage for any group of persons within permitted categories defined in the policy. Policies referred to in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) shall comply with the provisions of this section specifically referring thereto. Policies referred to in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, or (7) to (9), inclusive, of subdivision (a) may provide that the cost of the insurance coverage shall be borne by either the policyholder, or the individuals insured or their parents or guardians, payable through the policyholder. In the absence of a policy provision excluding coverage for otherwise covered individuals who have not individually enrolled with the policyholder and undertaken to pay all or a specified portion of the premium allocable to the individual, the
 policy shall provide the described insurance for all who fall within the categories of covered individuals defined in the policy. The policy may, but is not required to, contain provisions requiring a minimum number of participating persons or a minimum percentage of participation before the policy is effective. In the absence of such a provision, coverage shall not be denied any individual otherwise eligible on those grounds.

(c) A policy described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, or (7) to (9), inclusive, of subdivision (a) shall not be issued until approved as to substance and form by the commissioner. The commissioner may, after notice and hearing, promulgate reasonable rules and regulations relating to the substance, form, and issuance of the policies that are necessary or desirable to preserve, insofar as applicable, standards of substance, form, and issuance comparable to the standards prescribed by this chapter that are applicable
 to other types of disability policies, and to further the purposes for which the policies are issued.

(d) A policy described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) shall not be issued until approved as to form by the commissioner. The commissioner may, after notice and hearing, promulgate reasonable rules and regulations relating to the form and issuance of the policies that do not affect the substance of the coverage, and that are necessary or desirable to preserve, insofar as applicable, standards of form and issuance comparable to the standards prescribed by this chapter that are applicable to other types of disability policies, and to further the purposes for which the policies are issued. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 10113, the policy may incorporate by reference any of the appropriate provisions of Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code and the authorized regulations of the
 Director of Employment Development.

(e) A policy described in this section shall not constitute workers’ compensation insurance, as defined in Section 109. A policy described in paragraphs (3), (5), (7), (8), or (9) of subdivision (a) shall not be marketed or sold as a substitute for health insurance coverage compliant with the requirements of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152).

(f) (1) An insurer that intends to issue a policy of blanket insurance authorized by the amendments to this section pursuant to the act adding this subdivision, or authorized pursuant to Section 10270.2.5, using a policy form previously approved by the commissioner, where the only new language in the policy is the specification of the policyholder,
 covered persons, or the hazards or activities insured, shall file that new language with the commissioner prior to issuance of the policy. Submissions of documents containing variable text or blanks shall include complete lists of the variable wording or accurate descriptions of the material to be inserted in lieu of the variable wording or in the blanks of these documents.

(2) A policy using the new language shall not be issued until either 30 days expires without notice from the commissioner after the new language is filed, or the commissioner gives their written approval prior to that time. If the commissioner at any time notifies the insurer, in writing and specifying the reasons for the opinion, that the filed new language does not comply with the requirements of law, the insurer shall not issue any policy containing that language.

(3) This subdivision shall not be construed
 to provide separate authority for the commissioner to reopen review of previously approved policy forms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 558, Sec. 20.   (AB 487)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.2.5.

(a) In addition to the permitted types of blanket insurance issued to entities described in Section 10270.2, the commissioner may, in his or her discretion, add other entities that may be eligible to purchase blanket insurance for any class of risks relating to benefits for death or dismemberment, or for hospital, medical, surgical, or nursing expenses, resulting from accident which may be properly eligible for blanket insurance.

(b) (1) The commissioner may issue a letter order, and shall post the letter order on the Internet Web site of the Department of Insurance, any time he or she exercises discretion pursuant
 to subdivision (a) to add other entities that may be eligible to purchase blanket insurance. These letter orders shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) The commissioner may withdraw a letter order issued pursuant to this section in the manner described in subdivision (f) of Section 10291.5. A proceeding under this subdivision shall not be subject to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 321, Sec. 3.   (AB 2084)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.3.

(a) A blanket disability policy of a type permitted under paragraph (2) or (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 10270.2 may include either a coordination of benefits policy provision or a nonduplication of benefits policy provision, at the option of the policyholder.

(b) The essential
 features of any policy under paragraph (2) or (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 10270.2 shall be disclosed to the insured, or the parent or legal guardian of the insured, prior to enrollment in that policy. All disclosures shall state whether or not the benefits payable under the blanket insurance policy are subject to reduction, to the extent provided in the policy, if an individual insured thereunder is entitled to benefits, whether on an indemnity basis or on a provision-of-service basis, for hospital, medical, dental, or surgical expenses under any other valid and collectible individual, group, or blanket insurance policy or contract, hospital or medical service program, or group-practice prepayment plan, except for automobile medical payments insurance.

(c) The disclosure material shall be submitted to the commissioner for review
 with the blanket insurance policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 321, Sec. 4.   (AB 2084)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.4.

Any disability insurer may issue policies of group disability insurance and family expense disability insurance as defined in this article but shall not issue any form of policy of group disability insurance, or family expense disability insurance except as prescribed in this article and except as provided in Article 6.7 of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1. Provided, however, that during the calendar years of 1952 to 1956, inclusive, a policy of family expense disability insurance as defined in Section 10270.7 may either (1) contain the provisions required by Section 10270.8 and those promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to Sections 10270.9 and 10270.93 and be subject to this article and to Section 10291.5 or (2) be filed and approved under Article 2 of this chapter and be subject to such article and to Articles 3a, 4a and 5a of this chapter and contain the provision required by Section 10270.8(b). On and after January 1, 1957 the provisions of this article shall no longer relate to such policies except Section 10270.7 and subdivision (b) of Section 10270.8 and all of such policies shall be subject to the provisions set forth in alternative (2) above, except that such policies need not comply with subsection (c) of Section 10320 if they comply with Section 10270.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2055.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.5.

Group disability insurance is that form of disability insurance which conforms to all of the following conditions:

(a) Written under a master policy, issued to any of the following:

(1) The federal or state government, any federal or state agency, political subdivision or district, any public, governmental, or municipal corporation, any unit, agency, or department thereof, any corporation, copartnership or individual employer, or to the trustee of any association of employers, offering insurance to all the employees of the employer or of the employer members of the association or to all of any class or classes thereof determined by conditions pertaining to employment and covering not less than two such employees or those employees together with their dependents or spouses for amounts of insurance based upon some plan which will preclude individual selection by the employee as to the amount of his or her insurance coverage thereunder.

(2) A principal eligible to have issued to him or her a policy of group life insurance under the provisions of Section 10203.7 and insuring not less than two agents as defined in that section and eligible thereunder to be insured, or those agents together with their dependents or spouses.

(3) Any association having a constitution and bylaws and formed and continuously maintained in good faith for purposes other than that of obtaining insurance, offering insurance to all the eligible members, or class of members, of the association and covering not less than two such members or those members together with their dependents or spouses and not less than 25 percent of all eligible members, or class of members, for amounts of insurance based upon some plan which will preclude individual selection by the member as to the amount of his or her insurance coverage thereunder. If the master policy is to be issued to cover members of labor unions, it may be issued to more than one such union.

(4) An association or a trust, or the trustees of a fund established, created, or maintained for the benefit of members of one or more associations. The association or associations shall have at the outset a minimum membership of 100 persons, and shall be organized and maintained in good faith for purposes other than that of obtaining insurance. The association or associations shall have been in active existence for at least two years, and shall have a constitution and bylaws which require regular meetings not less than annually to further purposes of the members. The members shall have voting privileges and representation on the governing board or boards and committees. The policy shall be subject to the following requirements:

(A) The policy may insure members of the association or associations, and employees thereof.

(B) The premium for the policy shall be paid from funds contributed by the association or associations, or by members, or by both, or from funds contributed by the covered persons, or from both the covered persons and the association.

(C) A policy on which no part of the premium is to be derived from funds contributed by the covered persons specifically for the insurance shall insure all eligible persons, except those who, in writing, reject the coverage.

(5) Any trustees eligible to have issued to them a policy of group life insurance under the provisions of Section 10202.8 and insuring not less than two employees or members eligible thereunder to be insured or those employees or members together with their dependents or spouses.

(6) A school district or districts, the governing board of any school district or districts, a private or parochial school or schools, or the governing board or person in charge of the operation of any private or parochial school or schools, insuring not less than 50 pupils of the school or district and providing benefits to pupils or persons responsible for their support for death or dismemberment resulting from accident or for hospital, medical and surgical expenses resulting from accident to those pupils while they are in or on buildings or premises of the schools or districts during the time the pupils are required to be therein or thereon by reason of their attendance upon a college or a regular day school or any regular day school of a school district or districts or while being transported by the school or schools or district or districts to and from school or other place of instruction or while at any other place as an incident to school-sponsored activities and while being transported to, from and between these places.

(b) Transmission or collection of all premiums or premium contributions shall be performed by the policyholder, except where the policy specifies the persons other than the policyholder by whom the transmission or collection shall be made, and in one of the following situations:

(1) If the policy covers the employees of more than one employer, the insurer may collect premium contributions from individual employers whose employees are insured or may assist the policyholder in making these collections. If the employees of more than 100 such employers are covered under that policy, it shall state as a separate part of the premium to be charged for the policy the amount to be charged by the insurer for the collection.

(2) If the policy covers a group of governmental employees and the governmental unit paying those employees will not transmit their premium contribution after payroll deduction, the insurer may collect from the individual employees. If more than 100 of these employees are covered under that policy, it shall state as a separate part of the premium to be charged for the policy the amount to be charged by the insurer for the collection.

(3) If individual members of the group make payment of their share of the premium contribution to the insurer with or without billing or solicitation by the insurer during a period of temporary absence from active work of not exceeding 90 days, the payment may be received without the necessity of any separately stated charge by the insurer.

(4) If the policy covers the members of an association, the insurer may collect premium contributions from individual members or may assist the policyholder in making these collections. If more than 100 such members are covered under that policy, it shall state as a part of the premium to be charged for the policy the amount to be charged by the insurer for the collection.

(c) There is issued and delivered in accordance with the policy provision required by subdivision (b) of Section 10270.6 an individual certificate setting forth the benefits and the exceptions under, and referring to, the master policy under which the certificate is issued.

Those certificates are not subject to the provisions of this chapter relating to the master policy, but the forms thereof shall be submitted to the commissioner for his or her approval and shall not be issued without approval of the forms in the manner provided in the case of the master policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 78, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.505.

Another permitted form of group disability insurance is that which conforms to all of the following conditions.

(1) Covering debtors who are or become obligated to repay an indebtedness in substantially equal installments, or to repay a portion of an indebtedness in substantially equal installments over a year or more and repay a final balance in any amount on a date certain thereafter, to one creditor, as “creditor” is defined in subdivision (3) of Section 779.2.

(2) The group numbers not less than 10 new entrants yearly.

(3) The amounts insured on any one debtor do not exceed those permitted by Section 779.4.

(4) The policy is issued upon application of and made payable to the creditor or his successor in interest and such alternate beneficiaries as are required by Article 5.9 (commencing with Section 779.1) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1, and the premiums are paid by or through the creditor.

A policy issued under this section shall conform to all applicable provisions of this code.
